Washington statutes.
RCW 19.146.265

Branch offices—Fee—Licenses—Rules.

A licensee may not maintain more than one place of business under the same license unless:

(1) The director approves the licensed mortgage broker's application, made in a form and manner established in rule, to establish one or more branch offices under the same or different name as the main office. The applicant must be in good standing with the department, as defined in rule by the director, and the director must promptly issue a license for each of the branch offices showing the location of the main office and the particular branch; or

(2) The place of business is a licensed mortgage loan originator's residence and the licensed mortgage loan originator and licensed sponsoring company comply with state and federal information security requirements and other requirements as provided in this chapter and in rule, consistent with the purposes of this section.

[ 2021 c 15 s 4; 2015 c 229 s 16; 1997 c 106 s 19; 1994 c 33 s 24; 1993 c 468 s 18.]

NOTES:

Severability—1997 c 106: See note following RCW 19.146.010.

Adoption of rules—Severability—1993 c 468: See notes following RCW 19.146.0201.

Effective dates—1993 c 468: See note following RCW 19.146.200.